Rhode Island, session 2025, SB527.
It is enacted by the General Assembly as follows:
SECTION 1. Section 34-7-4 of the General Laws in Chapter 34-7 entitled "By Possession
and Prescription" is hereby amended to read as follows:
34-7-4. Right of footway denied.
No right of footway, except within one hundred (100) yards of the Pawtuxet River in the
cities of Warwick and Cranston or claimed in connection with a right to pass with carriages, shall
be acquired by prescription or adverse use for any length of time.
SECTION 2. This act shall take effect upon passage.
========
LC000412
========